North Carolina, session 2025, HB876.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 4 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-402.1. Administrative review of applications for development approvals.
(a) Within two business days of a local government's receipt of an application for
development approval, the local government shall complete an administrative review of the
application and any supporting documents and make an administrative decision that does one of
the following:
(1) Notifies the developer in writing that the application is complete and no
further information is required for the local government to make a
development approval determination.
(2) Notifies the developer in writing that the application is deficient and provides
the developer with a deficiency list, in writing, that identifies all of the
following:
a. Each deficiency.
b. The specific law, ordinance, policy, or procedure used as the basis for
each deficiency.
c. A description of the action the local government would deem
corrective for each deficiency identified.
(b) The notice under subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section may include local
government recommendations pertaining to the development project but any recommendations
must be clearly designated as recommended or advisory only and shall not be required as a
condition for a development approval determination.
(c) Upon a developer's receipt of a notice of a deficient application and a deficiency list
under subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, the developer may do any of the following:
(1) Correct the deficient application and resubmit a corrected application to the
local government.
(2) Submit a written explanation for each deficiency and request another
administrative review under this section that shall be completed by the local
*H876-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
government within two business days and takes into consideration the written
explanation.
(3) Appeal the administrative decision as provided in G.S. 160D-405.
(d) Within two business days of a local government's receipt of a corrected application
under subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section, the local government shall notify the
developer in writing whether the application (i) is complete and no further information is required
for the local government to make a development approval determination or (ii) does not correct
all of the deficiencies identified in accordance with subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this
section. If the developer amended or altered the application with respect to matters that are
unrelated to the deficiencies identified in accordance with subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of
this section, the local government shall consider the corrected application a new application to
be processed in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(e) A local government may utilize and contract with the Department of Insurance and
its marketplace pool of qualified Code-enforcement officials or contract with a licensed
professional engineer or licensed architect certified under G.S. 143-151.13(f) to perform
independent third-party plan reviews under this section, provided that the review time does not
exceed time frames prescribed by this section.
(f) If the local government does not issue applicable application decisions or determines
it is unable to complete application reviews within the time frames prescribed by this section, the
permit applicant may elect to utilize and contract with the Department of Insurance and its
marketplace pool of qualified Code-enforcement officials or elect to contract with a licensed
professional engineer or licensed architect certified under G.S. 143-151.13(f) to perform
independent third-party plan reviews and certify submitted plans as required by subsection (g) of
this section. Upon acceptance of a completed plan review with certification required by
subsection (g) of this section, the local government shall issue applicable permits for the project
within two business days and will refund or waive all applicable plan review and permit fees for
the project upon issuance of the applicable permits.
(g) An applicant that elects a third-party review under subsection (f) of this section shall
provide the local government with a written certification signed by the plan reviewer that plans
comply with applicable North Carolina State Building Codes and all other applicable State and
local laws. The certification shall be made on a form created by the local government.
(h) Conflicts of Interest. – Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-1108, a third-party plan reviewer
shall avoid conflicts of interest in conducting independent third-party plan reviews under this
section. Conflicts of interest include a plan reviewer having any financial interest in, or being
employed, other than as a plan reviewer under this section, by a business that has a financial
interest in, the furnishing of labor, material, or appliances for the construction, alteration, or
maintenance of, or any involvement in the making of plans or specifications for, the project
subject to plan review.
(i) This section shall not apply to permit applications submitted pursuant to
G.S. 160D-1110.1."
SECTION 2. G.S. 160D-1110(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A building permit shall be in writing and shall contain a provision that the work done
shall comply with the North Carolina State Building Code and all other applicable State and local
laws. Nothing in this section requires a local government to review and approve residential
building plans submitted to the local government pursuant to the North Carolina Residential
Code, so long as the local government may review and approve the residential building plans as
it deems necessary. If a local government chooses to review residential building plans for any
structures subject to regulation under the North Carolina Residential Code, all initial reviews for
the building permit shall be performed within 15 two business days of submission of the plans.
plans, in accordance with G.S. 160D-402.1. A local government shall not require residential
building plans for one- and two-family dwellings to be sealed by a licensed engineer or licensed
Page 2 House Bill 876-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
architect unless required by the North Carolina State Building Code. No building permits shall
be issued unless the plans and specifications are identified by the name and address of their
author. If the General Statutes require that plans for certain types of work be prepared only by a
licensed architect or licensed engineer, no building permit shall be issued unless the plans and
specifications bear the North Carolina seal of a licensed architect or of a licensed engineer. When
any provision of the General Statutes or of any ordinance or development or zoning regulation
requires that work be done by a licensed specialty contractor of any kind, no building permit for
the work shall be issued unless the work is to be performed by a licensed contractor."
SECTION 3. G.S. 160D-1104 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-1104. Duties and responsibilities.
(a) The duties and responsibilities of an inspection department and of the inspectors in it
are to enforce within their planning and development regulation jurisdiction State and local laws
relating to the following:
(1) The construction of buildings and other structures.
(2) The installation of such facilities as plumbing systems, electrical systems,
heating systems, refrigeration systems, and air-conditioning systems.
(3) The maintenance of buildings and other structures in a safe, sanitary, and
healthful condition.
(4) Other matters that may be specified by the governing board.
(b) The duties and responsibilities set forth in subsection (a) of this section include the
receipt of applications for permits and the issuance or denial of permits, the making of any
necessary inspections in a timely manner, not to exceed two business days from the first request
for an inspection, the issuance or denial of certificates of compliance, the issuance of orders to
correct violations, the bringing of judicial actions against actual or threatened violations, the
keeping of adequate records, and any other actions that may be required in order adequately to
enforce those laws. If an inspection cannot be completed within two business days from the first
request for inspection, the inspection department shall notify the permit holder. The governing
board has the authority to enact reasonable and appropriate provisions governing the enforcement
of those laws.
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 143-151.8(a)(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Code enforcement. – The examination and approval of plans and
specifications, the inspection of the manner of construction, workmanship,
and materials for construction of buildings and structures and their
components, or the enforcement of fire code regulations by any of the
following, to assure compliance with the State Building Code and related local
building rules:
a. An employee of the State or local government, except an employee of
the State Department of Labor engaged in the administration and
enforcement of sections of the Code that pertain to boilers and
elevators.
b. An employee of a federally recognized Indian Tribe employed to
perform inspections on tribal lands.
c. An individual contracting with the State, a local government, or a
federally recognized Indian Tribe to perform inspections on tribal
lands.
d. An individual who is employed by a company contracting with a
county or a city to conduct inspections.
e. A person who is contracting with a local government to perform
third-party plan reviews under G.S. 160D-402.1(e).
House Bill 876-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
f. A person who is contracting with a permit applicant to perform
third-party plan reviews under G.S. 160D-402.1(f)."
SECTION 5. G.S. 143-151.12(9) reads as rewritten:
"(9) Establish within the Department of Insurance a marketplace pool of qualified
Code-enforcement officials available for the following purposes:
a. When requested by the Insurance Commissioner, to assist in the
discharge of the Commissioner's duty under G.S. 143-139 to
supervise, administer, and enforce the North Carolina State Building
Code.
…
c. When requested by a permit applicant under G.S. 160D-402.1(f)."
SECTION 6. G.S. 143-151.13 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(g) A licensed architect or licensed professional engineer who possesses a valid
certificate under subsection (f) of this section but is not employed by the State or a local
government may utilize that certificate for the limited purpose of performing independent
third-party plan reviews under subsections (e) and (f) of G.S. 160D-402.1."
SECTION 7. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
applications submitted on or after that date.
Page 4 House Bill 876-First Edition